Maryland, session 2026, HB0463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
3–702.
(a) Subject to subsections (b) [and], (c), AND (D) of this section, § 3–711 of this
subtitle, and Title 7, Subtitle 5 of this article, an incarcerated individual committed to the
custody of the Commissioner is entitled to a diminution of the incarcerated individual’s
term of confinement as provided under this subtitle.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, an incarcerated individual
who is serving a sentence for a violation of § 3–303 or § 3–304 of the Criminal Law Article
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0463*

HOUSE BILL 463
involving a victim who is a child under the age of 16 years, or an incarcerated individual
who is serving a sentence for a violation of § 3–305 or § 3–306 of the Criminal Law Article,
as the sections existed before October 1, 2017, involving a victim who is a child under the
age of 16 years, is not entitled to a diminution of the incarcerated individual’s term of
confinement as provided under this subtitle.
(2) An incarcerated individual who is serving a sentence for a violation of
§ 3–303 of the Criminal Law Article that occurred on or after October 1, 2024, is not entitled
to a diminution of the incarcerated individual’s term of confinement as provided under this
subtitle.
(c) An incarcerated individual who is serving a sentence for a violation of § 3–307
of the Criminal Law Article involving a victim who is a child under the age of 16 years is
not entitled to a diminution of the incarcerated individual’s term of confinement as provided
under this subtitle, if the incarcerated individual was previously convicted of a violation of
§ 3–307 of the Criminal Law Article involving a victim who is a child under the age of 16
years.
(D) AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SERVING A SENTENCE FOR A
VIOLATION OF § 2–201 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE IS NOT ENTITLED TO A
DIMINUTION OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S TERM OF CONFINEMENT AS
PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any offense committed before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.